Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 822.125 is amended to read:
822.125. (1) The holder of a current, valid dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110 is not
subject to the prohibitions and penalties under ORS 822.100 as long as the  holder’s motor vehicle
dismantling business is conducted in the location approved under the certificate.
(2) The  holder of a dismantler certificate may expand the dimensions or move a place of business
approved under the dismantler certificate or open an additional place of business under  the certif-
icate upon issuance of a supplemental dismantler certificate  by the Department of Transportation.
The following apply to supplemental certificates issued under this subsection:
(a) The department shall grant  a supplemental certificate upon request of an applicant under
this subsection if the  applicant obtains local government permission for the supplemental certificate
under ORS 822.140.
(b) Upon application for renewal of the supplemental certificate, the department may waive the
requirement that an applicant for renewal  under this subsection obtain local government approval
under ORS 822.140 of the suitability of the applicant to establish, maintain or operate a  motor ve-
hicle dismantling business.
(c) A fee shall be charged for a supplemental dismantler certificate under ORS 822.700.
(3) A dismantler  certificate is valid for a [ one-year] two-year  period and may be renewed as
provided by the department. The department shall only renew the certificate  of any certificate
holder who does all of the following:
(a) Pays the required fee for renewal under ORS 822.700.
(b) Completes the application described in ORS 822.115.
(c) Obtains local government approval under  ORS 822.140. The department may waive the re-
quirement that an applicant for renewal obtain local government approval under ORS 822.140 of the
suitability of the applicant to establish, maintain or operate a motor vehicle dismantling business.
(d) Maintains a current bond that meets the requirements under ORS 822.120.
(4) The department may provide  the holder of a dismantler certificate with identification cards
in the names of the  owners of the business or in the names of authorized employees of the business.
(5) The department may adopt suitable rules for the issuance and renewal of dismantler certif-
icates and identification cards.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 822.700 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2706 (HB 2706-A) Page 1
822.700. (1) Fee  for issuance or renewal of dismantler certificates covering a single place of
business, or a supplemental certificate for each additional place  of business to be covered by that
certificate and operated under the same name, [ $500] $1,000.
(2) Fee for each duplicate dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110, $40.
(3) Fee for original issuance  or renewal of vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 of a
vehicle dealer certificate:
(a) $1,100, for a certificate covering a single place of business; and
(b) $350, for each additional  place of business to be covered by the certificate and operated
under the same name.
(4) Fee for each corrected vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.040, $30.
(5) If a vehicle dealer or dismantler fails to pay a fee required under this section  on or before
the date the fee is due, there shall be added as a late payment charge a fee of $150.
(6) Fee for show license issued under ORS 822.084, $50.
(7) Fee for issuance of towing business certificate under ORS 822.205  or renewal under ORS
822.210, $17 for each vehicle used for towing or recovery purposes.
(8) Fee for issuance or renewal of vehicle transporter certificate under ORS 822.310, $450.
(9) Fee for issuance or renewal of driver training instructor certificate under  ORS 822.515, $200.
(10) Fee for issuance or renewal of commercial driver training school certificate under  ORS
822.515, $400.
(11) Fee for issuance or renewal of vehicle appraiser certificate under ORS 819.480, $100.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 822.125 and 822.700 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2025
Act apply to dismantler certificates issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this
2025 Act.
Passed by House May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2706 (HB 2706-A) Page 2